Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1408
Membership on council; other public office or employment.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, ordinance, or charter provision to the contrary, membership on the council shall not disqualify any member from holding any other public office or employment, or cause the forfeiture thereof.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 8, p. 2928.